Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.140

Commercial vehicle.

"Commercial vehicle" means any vehicle the principal use of which is the transportation of commodities, merchandise, produce, freight, animals, or passengers for hire.

[ 1961 c 12 s 46.04.140. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 15; prior: (i) 1943 c 153 s 1, part; 1937 c 188 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6312-1, part. (ii) 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part.]